Hawaii statutes.
[§353F-5] Annual report. The
commission shall submit to the legislature, not fewer than twenty days prior to
the convening of each regular session, an annual report of its activities and
of its recommended legislative proposals. [L 1993, c 343, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next